Hawaii statutes.
§142-16 Dairy and breeding cattle;
tuberculin tests. All dairy and breeding cattle within the State shall be
tuberculin tested by the department of agriculture as often as in its judgment
such testing is necessary in order to prevent, suppress, and eradicate bovine
tuberculosis. All cattle so tested shall be marked by the department with some
distinguishing mark. The department may, for the purpose of making the tests,
go upon any property where such cattle are kept. [L 1923, c 124, §1; RL 1925,
§626; am L 1925, c 5, §1; am L Sp 1932 2d, c 39, §1; am L 1933, c 57, §1; RL
1935, §222; am L 1939, c 111, §1; RL 1945, §1076; am L 1945, c 104, §1; RL
1955, §20-17; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §142-16]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next